Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF24.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1313YH (4) 91 as/js H.F. 24 Section 1. Section 717F.1, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (11) A member of the subdivision 3 selachimorpha of the neoselachii clade, which are any species 4 of sharks, that can grow to more than twenty-three inches in 5 length or that has a documented history of biting humans. 6 Sec. 2. Section 717F.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 7 following new subsection: 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 13. The person must not allow any member of 9 the public to have direct contact with a dangerous wild animal 10 as provided in section 717F.14. 11 Sec. 3. Section 717F.7, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, 12 is amended to read as follows: 13 This chapter , excluding section 717F.14, does not apply to 14 any of the following: 15 Sec. 4. Section 717F.13, Code 2025, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 717F.13 Criminal penalties. 18 A person who intentionally causes a dangerous wild animal to 19 escape in violation of this chapter , or who violates section 20 717F.14, is guilty of an aggravated misdemeanor. 21 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 717F.14 Public contact with dangerous 22 wild animals prohibited. 23 1. Notwithstanding section 717F.4, 717F.7, or any other 24 provision of law, a person shall not allow any member of the 25 public to come in direct contact with a dangerous wild animal. 26 2. For purposes of this section: 27 a. âDirect contactâ means physical contact or proximity 28 where physical contact is possible, including but not limited 29 to any proximity without a permanent barrier designed to 30 prevent physical contact between the public and a dangerous 31 wild animal. 32 b. âMember of the publicâ means a person not authorized to 33 be in direct contact with a dangerous wild animal pursuant to 34 an exemption in section 717F.7. 35 -1- LSB 1313YH (4) 91 as/js 1/ 2 H.F. 24